Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-668.03
Unemployment compensation; services performed in foreign country; facilities and services; utilize.

To the extent permissible under the laws and Constitution of the United States, the commissioner is authorized to enter into or cooperate in arrangements whereby facilities and services provided under the Employment Security Law and facilities and services provided under the unemployment compensation law of any foreign government may be utilized for the taking of claims and the payment of benefits under the unemployment insurance law of this state or under a similar law of such government.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 18, p. 402;

Laws 1939, c. 56, § 12, p. 251;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-717;

R.S.1943, § 48-668;

Laws 1945, c. 115, § 8, p. 387;

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 17(4), p. 434;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 51.